New York, session 2025-2026, S287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive Eagle Scout plates. 1. Any person residing in 4 this state shall, upon request, be issued a distinctive plate in support 5 of the Eagle Scouts of a design approved by the commissioner in consul- 6 tation with the National Council of the Boy Scouts of America. 7 2. An application for such plate shall be filed with the commissioner 8 in such form and detail as the commissioner shall prescribe. 9 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 10 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 11 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 12 and an initial one time service charge of twenty-five dollars shall be 13 charged for such plates. 14 § 2. 1. A distinctive plate established pursuant to section 404-ff of 15 the vehicle and traffic law as added by section one of this act shall 16 only be designed, produced and issued upon the delivery to the depart- 17 ment of a surety bond in the amount of six thousand dollars, which shall 18 be executed by a surety company authorized by the department of finan- 19 cial services to transact business in this state. Provided, however, 20 that if the commissioner of motor vehicles shall have received prior to 21 plate design, production and issuance at least two hundred orders for 22 such distinctive plate together with the additional annual service 23 charge applicable to each such order, which shall be non-refundable, no EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01056-01-5 S. 287 2 1 such surety bond shall be required. All such service charges shall be 2 deposited pursuant to the provisions of section 404-oo of the vehicle 3 and traffic law to the credit of the department of motor vehicles 4 distinctive plate development fund established by section 95-g of the 5 state finance law and shall be used for the design, production, adver- 6 tising and distribution of distinctive license plates in accordance with 7 such section 95-g. 8 2. If, upon the expiration of two years following the date upon which 9 distinctive plates in the series are first available for sale two 10 hundred or more sets of such plates are sold, a bond delivered pursuant 11 to this section shall be discontinued. If fewer than two hundred sets of 12 such plates are sold by such time, such department shall be entitled to 13 recover against the bond in an amount proportionate to such shortfall. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 15 section one of this act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth 16 day after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addi- 17 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 18 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 19 be made on or before such effective date.